Maryland, session 2025, HB0983.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
TITLE 15.5. LANGUAGE–RELATED ASSISTANCE LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM.
15.5–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
– 1 –

Ch. 278 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) “DESIGNATED LANGUAGE” MEANS A LANGUAGE OTHER THAN ENGLISH
IN WHICH THE STATE BOARD DETERMINES A LOCAL BOARD IS REQUIRED TO
PROVIDE ASSISTANCE TO VOTERS UNDER THIS TITLE.
(C) “LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENCY” MEANS THAT AN INDIVIDUAL:
(1) SPEAKS A PARTICULAR LANGUAGE OTHER THAN ENGLISH;
(2) DOES NOT SPEAK ENGLISH AS A PRIMARY LANGUAGE; AND
(3) SPEAKS, READS, OR UNDERSTANDS THE ENGLISH LANGUAGE
LESS THAN “VERY WELL”, AS REPORTED IN AVAILABLE U.S. CENSUS BUREAU DATA
OR DATA OF COMPARABLE QUALITY COLLECTED BY A PUBLIC OFFICE.
(D) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
(E) “VOTING MATERIALS” INCLUDES:
(1) VOTER REGISTRATION FORMS STATEWIDE VOTER REGISTRATION
APPLICATIONS;
(2) ABSENTEE BALLOT APPLICATIONS STATE BOARD APPROVED
ABSENTEE BALLOT APPLICATIONS;
(3) SPECIMEN BALLOTS; AND
(4) FORMS AND INSTRUCTIONS THAT THE STATE BOARD
DETERMINES APPROPRIATE TO FACILITATE VOTING NECESSARY TO VOTING.
15.5–102.
(A) THERE IS A LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
(B) A LOCAL BOARD SHALL PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM IF THE STATE
BOARD DETERMINES IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION THAT
THERE IS A SIGNIFICANT NEED FOR LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE TO VOTERS IN THE
COUNTY IN A LANGUAGE OTHER THAN ENGLISH.
(C) THE STATE BOARD SHALL DETERMINE NOT LATER THAN FEBRUARY 1
OF THE YEAR OF THE ELECTION THAT A SIGNIFICANT NEED FOR LANGUAGE
ASSISTANCE TO VOTERS EXISTS IN A COUNTY IF, BASED ON THE BEST AVAILABLE
DATA, INCLUDING INFORMATION FROM THE U.S. CENSUS BUREAU’S AMERICAN
COMMUNITY SURVEY OR DATA OF COMPARABLE QUALITY COLLECTED BY A PUBLIC
OFFICE:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 278
(1) MORE THAN 2% OF THE CITIZEN VOTING AGE POPULATION OF THE
COUNTY:
(I) USE A SINGLE SHARED LANGUAGE OTHER THAN ENGLISH;
AND
(II) HAVE LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENCY; OR
(2) MORE THAN 4,000 INDIVIDUALS OF THE CITIZEN VOTING AGE
POPULATION OF THE COUNTY USE A SINGLE SHARED LANGUAGE OTHER THAN
ENGLISH AND HAVE LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENCY.
(D) THE STATE BOARD SHALL DETERMINE THAT EACH LANGUAGE OTHER
THAN ENGLISH THAT IS USED BY AT LEAST THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS SPECIFIED
IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION IS A DESIGNATED LANGUAGE.
(E) (1) THE STATE BOARD SHALL PUBLISH AND MAINTAIN ON ITS
WEBSITE A LIST OF:
(I) EACH LOCAL BOARD THAT IS REQUIRED TO PROVIDE
LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE IN A LANGUAGE OTHER THAN ENGLISH; AND
(II) EACH DESIGNATED LANGUAGE IN WHICH THE LANGUAGE
ASSISTANCE IS REQUIRED TO BE PROVIDED BY THE LOCAL BOARD.
(2) THE STATE BOARD SHALL UPDATE THE INFORMATION
PUBLISHED AND MAINTAINED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION AT
LEAST EVERY 2 YEARS.
(F) THE STATE BOARD ADMINISTRATOR SHALL PROMPTLY NOTIFY EACH
LOCAL BOARD AND THE CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER OF THE COUNTY INCLUDED ON
THIS LIST UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION OF THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
TITLE.
15.5–103.
(A) EACH LOCAL BOARD THAT IS REQUIRED TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
PROGRAM SHALL, WITH THE ASSISTANCE OF OVERSIGHT FROM THE STATE BOARD,
PROVIDE TO VOTERS THE SERVICES DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) AT EACH EARLY VOTING CENTER AND ELECTION DAY POLLING
PLACE, A VOTER WHO HAS A NEED FOR LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE IN A DESIGNATED
LANGUAGE SHALL HAVE THE OPTION TO COMMUNICATE WITH THE ELECTION
– 3 –

Ch. 278 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
JUDGES THROUGH A TRANSLATOR WHO IS MADE AVAILABLE BY MEANS OF VIDEO
CONFERENCE TECHNOLOGY.
(2) THE STATE SHALL PROVIDE TO THE LOCAL BOARDS LICENSED
TRANSLATION SOFTWARE SERVICES TO IMPLEMENT THE PROGRAM AND THE
COUNTY SHALL PAY FOR ALL OTHER EXPENSES ASSOCIATED WITH THE PROGRAM,
INCLUDING NECESSARY HARDWARE AND EACH USE OF THE TRANSLATION SOFTWARE
SERVICES.
(C) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, THE LOCAL BOARD
SHALL POST STATE BOARD APPROVED SIGNAGE IN EACH EARLY VOTING CENTER
AND ELECTION DAY POLLING PLACE IN EACH DESIGNATED LANGUAGE NOTIFYING
VOTERS THAT LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE AND INTERPRETATION SERVICES ARE
AVAILABLE.
(D) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, THE LOCAL BOARD
SHALL PROVIDE ONLINE VOTING MATERIALS IN EACH DESIGNATED LANGUAGE.
(E) A LOCAL BOARD MAY PROVIDE SOLELY ORAL INSTRUCTIONS OR OTHER
ASSISTANCE IF THE LANGUAGE DOES NOT HAVE A WRITTEN FORM, SUCH AS SIGN
LANGUAGE AMERICAN SIGN LANGUAGE.
(F) THE LOCAL BOARD SHALL MAKE REASONABLE EFFORTS TO RECRUIT
BILINGUAL ELECTION JUDGES TO PROVIDE ASSISTANCE TO VOTERS IN DESIGNATED
LANGUAGES.
(G) THE LOCAL BOARD, WITH STATE BOARD APPROVAL, MAY PROVIDE
LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE SERVICES THAT ARE IN ADDITION TO THE LANGUAGE
ASSISTANCE SERVICES REQUIRED IN THIS SECTION.
15.5–104.
THE STATE BOARD MAY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
TITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before January 1, 2026,
the State Board of Elections shall publish on its website the information required under §
15.5–102(e) of the Election Law Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
IN THIS TITLE, “LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENCY” MEANS THAT AN
INDIVIDUAL:
(1) SPEAKS A PARTICULAR LANGUAGE OTHER THAN ENGLISH;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 278
(2) DOES NOT SPEAK ENGLISH AS A PRIMARY LANGUAGE; AND
(3) SPEAKS, READS, OR UNDERSTANDS THE ENGLISH LANGUAGE
LESS THAN “VERY WELL”, AS REPORTED IN AVAILABLE U.S. CENSUS BUREAU DATA
OR DATA OF COMPARABLE QUALITY COLLECTED BY A PUBLIC OFFICE.
15.5–102.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE STATE BOARD
SHALL DETERMINE WHETHER THERE IS A SIGNIFICANT AND SUBSTANTIAL NEED
FOR LANGUAGE–RELATED ASSISTANCE IN ONE OR MORE LANGUAGES OTHER THAN
ENGLISH BY A LOCAL BOARD DURING AN ELECTION.
(B) THE STATE BOARD SHALL DETERMINE THAT A SIGNIFICANT AND
SUBSTANTIAL NEED FOR LANGUAGE–RELATED ASSISTANCE BY A LOCAL BOARD
DURING AN ELECTION EXISTS IN A COUNTY IF, BASED ON THE BEST AVAILABLE
DATA, INCLUDING INFORMATION FROM THE U.S. CENSUS BUREAU’S AMERICAN
COMMUNITY SURVEY OR DATA OF COMPARABLE QUALITY COLLECTED BY A PUBLIC
OFFICE:
(1) MORE THAN 2%, BUT IN NO INSTANCE FEWER THAN 100
INDIVIDUALS, OF THE VOTING AGE POPULATION OF THE COUNTY:
(I) USE A SINGLE SHARED LANGUAGE OTHER THAN ENGLISH;
AND
(II) HAVE LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENCY; OR
(2) MORE THAN 4,000 INDIVIDUALS OF THE VOTING AGE POPULATION
OF THE COUNTY USE A SINGLE SHARED LANGUAGE OTHER THAN ENGLISH AND HAVE
LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENCY.
(C) THE STATE BOARD MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT ESTABLISH
ADDITIONAL CRITERIA FOR DETERMINING WHETHER A SIGNIFICANT AND
SUBSTANTIAL NEED FOR LANGUAGE–RELATED ASSISTANCE BY A LOCAL BOARD
DURING AN ELECTION EXISTS IN A COUNTY.
15.5–103.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, AND EVERY 2 YEARS THEREAFTER,
THE STATE BOARD SHALL PUBLISH AND MAINTAIN ON ITS WEBSITE A LIST OF:
(1) EACH LOCAL BOARD THAT IS REQUIRED TO PROVIDE
LANGUAGE–RELATED ASSISTANCE IN A LANGUAGE OTHER THAN ENGLISH; AND
– 5 –

Ch. 278 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) EACH LANGUAGE IN WHICH THE LANGUAGE–RELATED
ASSISTANCE IS REQUIRED TO BE PROVIDED BY THE LOCAL BOARD.
(B) THE STATE BOARD SHALL DISTRIBUTE THIS LIST TO EACH LOCAL
BOARD IN TIME TO ALLOW LOCAL BOARDS TO PROVIDE LANGUAGE–RELATED
ASSISTANCE UNDER § 15.5–104 OF THIS TITLE.
15.5–104.
(A) A LOCAL BOARD SHALL PROVIDE LANGUAGE–RELATED ASSISTANCE
AND MATERIALS IN VOTING AND ELECTIONS TO VOTERS WHO HAVE LIMITED
ENGLISH PROFICIENCY IN EACH LANGUAGE DESIGNATED BY THE STATE BOARD
UNDER § 15.5–102 OF THIS TITLE.
(B) WHENEVER THE STATE BOARD DETERMINES THAT
LANGUAGE–RELATED ASSISTANCE SHALL BE PROVIDED BY A LOCAL BOARD, THE
LOCAL BOARD SHALL PROVIDE COMPETENT ASSISTANCE AND PHYSICAL AND
ONLINE VOTING MATERIALS IN EACH DESIGNATED LANGUAGE UNDER § 15.5–102 OF
THIS TITLE.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
FOR EACH DESIGNATED LANGUAGE UNDER § 15.5–102 OF THIS TITLE, THE
LANGUAGE–RELATED ASSISTANCE AND MATERIALS SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) TRANSLATED REGISTRATION AND VOTING FORMS AND
NOTICES;
(II) ELECTION–RELATED MATERIALS;
(III) SIGNAGE AT ALL EARLY VOTING CENTERS AND POLLING
PLACES IN DESIGNATED LANGUAGES NOTIFYING VOTERS THAT LANGUAGE
ASSISTANCE AND TELEPHONE INTERPRETERS ARE AVAILABLE; AND
(IV) SAMPLE BALLOTS AND OTHER MATERIALS OR
INFORMATION RELATING TO THE ELECTORAL PROCESS.
(2) IN THE CASE OF A LANGUAGE THAT IS ORAL OR UNWRITTEN,
INCLUDING SIGN LANGUAGE, THE LOCAL BOARD MAY PROVIDE ONLY ORAL
INSTRUCTIONS, ASSISTANCE, OR OTHER INFORMATION RELATING TO THE
ELECTORAL PROCESS IN THE APPLICABLE LANGUAGE.
(D) (1) MATERIALS PROVIDED IN A DESIGNATED LANGUAGE SHALL:
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 278
(I) BE OF AN EQUAL QUALITY TO THE CORRESPONDING
ENGLISH LANGUAGE MATERIALS; AND
(II) BE MADE AVAILABLE AT THE SAME TIME AS THE
CORRESPONDING ENGLISH LANGUAGE MATERIALS.
(2) ALL TRANSLATIONS SHALL CONVEY THE INTENT AND ESSENTIAL
MEANING OF THE ORIGINAL TEXT OR COMMUNICATION AND MAY NOT SOLELY RELY
ON AUTOMATIC ELECTRONIC TRANSLATION SERVICES, INCLUDING MACHINE
TRANSLATION OR OTHER ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE APPLICATIONS.
(3) (I) IN ADDITION TO THE OTHER REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SECTION, LANGUAGE–RELATED ASSISTANCE SHALL INCLUDE THE PRESENCE OF
BILINGUAL ELECTION JUDGES WHERE AVAILABLE.
(II) A LOCAL BOARD SHALL MAKE REASONABLE EFFORTS TO
RECRUIT ELECTION JUDGES WHO ARE FLUENT IN EACH LANGUAGE DESIGNATED BY
THE STATE BOARD UNDER § 15.5–102 OF THIS TITLE, INCLUDING BY USING NOTICES
IN NEWSPAPERS, RADIO, TELEVISION, AND OTHER FORMS OF MEDIA, WITH A
PARTICULAR FOCUS ON MEDIA THAT SERVE NON–ENGLISH–SPEAKING CITIZENS IN
THE COUNTY.
(III) BILINGUAL ELECTION JUDGES SHALL PROVIDE DIRECT
ASSISTANCE TO VOTERS WHO HAVE LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENCY AND MAY NOT
ATTEMPT TO INTERPRET OR TRANSLATE ENGLISH LANGUAGE MATERIALS.
(E) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PREVENT A LOCAL BOARD
FROM VOLUNTARILY PROVIDING LANGUAGE–RELATED ASSISTANCE IN ADDITION TO
THE ASSISTANCE REQUIRED BY THIS TITLE.
15.5–105.
(A) THE STATE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT ESTABLISH A
REVIEW PROCESS TO DETERMINE WHETHER A SIGNIFICANT AND SUBSTANTIAL
NEED EXISTS FOR A LANGUAGE TO BE DESIGNATED UNDER § 15.5–102 OF THIS
TITLE.
(B) THE PROCESS ESTABLISHED BY THE STATE BOARD UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE, AT MINIMUM:
(1) AN OPPORTUNITY FOR THE FOLLOWING TO REQUEST THAT THE
STATE BOARD CONSIDER DESIGNATING A LANGUAGE UNDER § 15.5–102 OF THIS
TITLE:
– 7 –

Ch. 278 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) A VOTER;
(II) A GROUP OF VOTERS;
(III) AN ORGANIZATION WHOSE MEMBERSHIP INCLUDES VOTERS
OR IS LIKELY TO INCLUDE VOTERS;
(IV) AN ORGANIZATION WHOSE MISSION WOULD BE
FRUSTRATED BY A FAILURE TO PROVIDE LANGUAGE–RELATED ASSISTANCE UNDER
THIS TITLE; AND
(V) AN ORGANIZATION THAT WOULD EXPEND RESOURCES TO
FULFILL THE ORGANIZATION’S MISSION AS A RESULT OF A FAILURE TO PROVIDE
LANGUAGE–RELATED ASSISTANCE UNDER THIS TITLE; AND
(2) AN OPPORTUNITY FOR PUBLIC COMMENT.
(C) ON RECEIPT OF A REQUEST AND CONSIDERATION OF ANY PUBLIC
COMMENT, THE STATE BOARD SHALL DESIGNATE ANY LANGUAGE FOR WHICH IT
DETERMINES THE CRITERIA FOR DESIGNATION ARE MET.
15.5–106.
(A) THE FOLLOWING PERSONS MAY FILE AN ACTION TO ENFORCE THIS
TITLE:
(1) AN AGGRIEVED PERSON;
(2) AN ORGANIZATION WHOSE MEMBERSHIP INCLUDES OR IS LIKELY
TO INCLUDE AGGRIEVED PERSONS;
(3) AN ORGANIZATION WHOSE MISSION WOULD BE FRUSTRATED BY A
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION;
(4) AN ORGANIZATION THAT WOULD EXPEND RESOURCES TO FULFILL
ITS MISSION AS A RESULT OF A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION; OR
(5) THE STATE BOARD.
(B) (1) IN THE CASE OF A LOCAL BOARD THAT SEEKS TO PROVIDE ONLY
ENGLISH LANGUAGE MATERIALS DESPITE A DETERMINATION BY THE STATE BOARD
THAT THE LOCAL BOARD IS REQUIRED TO PROVIDE LANGUAGE–RELATED
ASSISTANCE UNDER THIS TITLE, THE LOCAL BOARD MAY FILE AN ACTION AGAINST
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 278
THE STATE BOARD SEEKING A DECLARATORY JUDGMENT ALLOWING THE LOCAL
BOARD TO PROVIDE ONLY ENGLISH LANGUAGE MATERIALS.
(2) THE COURT SHALL ENTER THE DECLARATORY JUDGMENT IN
FAVOR OF THE LOCAL BOARD ONLY IF THE COURT FINDS THAT THE DETERMINATION
BY THE STATE BOARD WAS ARBITRARY AND CAPRICIOUS OR AN ABUSE OF
DISCRETION.
(C) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY ISSUE SUBPOENAS AND HOLD
FACT–FINDING HEARINGS TO ENFORCE THE PROVISIONS OF THIS TITLE.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 9 –